Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.150.050

School holidays.

(1) All of the state legal holidays set forth in RCW 1.16.050(1) are also school holidays and school may not be taught on these days.

(2) No reduction from a teacher's time or salary may be made by reason of the fact that a school day happens to be one of the days referred to in this section as a day on which school is not taught.

[ 2022 c 198 s 2; 2014 c 177 s 3; 1989 c 233 s 11; 1985 c 189 s 2; 1984 c 92 s 1; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 24 s 2; 1973 c 32 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 283 s 13. Prior: 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.02.060; prior: 1955 c 20 s 2; 1909 c 97 p 308 s 6; RRS s 4853. Formerly RCW 28A.02.061, 28A.02.060, 28.02.060.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2022 c 198: "In 2021, the state enacted House Bill No. 1016 to declare Juneteenth a state legal holiday. The legislature finds that there is ambiguity about whether Juneteenth is also a school holiday as a result of that act. The legislature intends to clarify that Juneteenth, like all other state legal holidays, is a school holiday on which school may not be taught." [ 2022 c 198 s 1.]

Effective date—2022 c 198: "This act takes effect July 1, 2022." [ 2022 c 198 s 3.]

Findings—Intent—2014 c 177: See note following RCW 1.16.050.

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 283: "If any provision of this 1969 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1969 ex.s. c 283 s 59.]

"Legal holidays": RCW 1.16.050.